Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 22.1-28.
Supervision of schools in each division vested in school board.

The supervision of schools in each school division shall be vested in a school board selected as provided in this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.

History.

1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 7. As to membership in the Virginia Retirement System, generally, see Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1.

§ 22.1-29.
Qualifications of members.

Each person appointed or elected to a school board shall, at the time of his appointment or election, be a qualified voter and a bona fide resident of the district from which he is selected if appointment or election is by district or of the school division if appointment or election is at large; and if he shall cease to be a resident of such district or school division, his position on the school board shall be deemed vacant. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, general or special, in a locality that imposes district-based or ward-based residency requirements for members of the school board, the member elected from each district or ward shall be elected by the qualified voters of that district or ward and not by the locality at large.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-68, 22-90; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 78; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 25; 1980, c. 559; 1997, c. 727; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 225.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 225, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 225, effective January 1, 2022, added the second sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County planning commission member. —

Under the plain language of subsection A of § 22.1-30, a planning commission member is not precluded from being elected to, and serving on, a school board. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Matthew J. Britton, Commonwealth’s Attorney, 11-071, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 53 (7/8/11).

Member of town council may serve on county school board, subject to certain restrictions. —

A town councilman may concurrently serve on the county school board, provided all other eligibility requirements are met. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William A. Bell, Jr., Secretary, Isle of Wight County Electoral Board, 11-070, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 41 (9/30/11).

Members of town councils generally are precluded from serving on appointed school boards by § 22.1-30, but § 22.1-30 applies only to appointed school boards; however, members of both town councils and school boards are subject to restrictions imposed by the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William A. Bell, Jr., Secretary, Isle of Wight County Electoral Board, 11-070, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 41 (9/30/11).

Eligibility of candidates. —

In determining the eligibility of individuals who seek to stand for election to local office, the locality’s Electoral Board is required to determine, as a factual matter, whether a candidate for school board meets the statutory qualifications for office, at the time of the election. See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Cherlyn Starlet Stevens, Chair, City of Richmond Electoral Board, 16-043, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (8/26/16).

Prohibited transactions. —

School board member who wants to participate in a transaction involving salaries of school employees where the member’s spouse is school employee may not participate in a transaction under subdivision B 3 of §

2.2-3112

on the basis that it “affects the public generally”; however the school board member may participate in the transaction under subdivision B 1 of §

2.2-3112

as a “member of . . . a group of three or more persons [who are] affected by the transaction,” provided he or she makes the required declaration of personal interest pursuant to subsection H of §

2.2-3115

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David A. Reid, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 19-063, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (9/18/20).

§ 22.1-29.1.
Public hearing before appointment of school board members.

At least seven days prior to the appointment of any school board member pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, of §§

15.2-410

,

15.2-531

,

15.2-627

or §

15.2-837

, or of any municipal charter, the appointing authority shall hold one or more public hearings to receive the views of citizens within the school division. The appointing authority shall cause public notice to be given at least ten days prior to any hearing by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation within the school division. No nominee or applicant whose name has not been considered at a public hearing shall be appointed as a school board member.

History.

1985, c. 423; 1987, c. 430.

§ 22.1-30.
Certain officers may not act on school board or serve as tie breaker.

No state, county, city or town officer, no deputy of any such officer, no member of the governing body of a county, city or town, no employee of a school board, and no father, mother, brother, sister, spouse, son, daughter, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, sister-in-law or brother-in-law of a member of the county governing body may, during his term of office, be appointed as a member of the school board for such county, city or town or as tie breaker for such school board except:

Local directors of social services;

Commissioners in chancery;

Commissioners of accounts;

Registrars of vital records and health statistics;

Notaries public;

Clerks and employees of the federal government in the District of Columbia;

Medical examiners;

Officers and employees of the District of Columbia;

In Northumberland County, oyster inspectors;

In Lunenburg County, members of the county library board and members of the local board of social services;

Auxiliary deputy sheriffs and auxiliary police officers receiving less than five dollars in annual compensation;

Members of the town councils serving towns within Craig, Giles and Wise Counties; and

Public defenders.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the election of deputies of constitutional officers to school board membership, consistent with federal law and regulation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-69, 22-92; 1973, c. 63; 1980, c. 559; 1986, c. 260; 1990, c. 111; 1991, cc. 140, 163; 1993, c. 352; 1994, c. 723; 1995, c. 290; 2002, c. 747.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted a semicolon for a comma at the end of subdivisions A 1 to A 12; substituted “directors of social services” for “superintendents of public welfare” in subdivision A 1; and substituted “local board of social services” for “board of public welfare” in subdivision A 10.

§ 22.1-31.
Oath.

Before entering upon the duties of office, each person appointed to a school board shall take and subscribe the oath prescribed for an officer of this Commonwealth as provided in Chapter 1 (§

49-1

et seq.) of Title 49.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-66, 22-91; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-32.
Salary of members.

Any elected or appointed school board may pay each of its members an annual salary that is consistent with the salary procedures and no more than the salary limits provided for local governments in Article 1.1 (§

15.2-1414.1

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 15.2 or as provided by charter, provided that:

Any school board may pay the chairman of the school board an additional salary not exceeding $2,000 per year upon passage of an appropriate resolution by (i) the school board whose membership is elected in whole or in part or (ii) the governing body of the appropriate county, city, or town whose school board is comprised solely of appointed members.

Any school board may pay each of its members mileage for use of a private vehicle in attending meetings of the school board and in conducting other official business of the school board. Its members may be reimbursed for private transportation at a rate not to exceed that which is authorized for persons traveling on state business in accordance with §

2.2-2825

. Whatever rate is paid, however, shall be the same for school board members and employees of the board.

No school board shall be awarded a salary increase unless, upon an affirmative vote by such school board, a specific salary increase is approved. Local school boards shall adopt such increases according to the following procedures:

A local school board representing a county may establish a salary increase prior to July 1 of any year in which members are to be elected or appointed, or, if such school board is elected or appointed for staggered terms, prior to July 1 of any year in which at least two members are to be elected or appointed. Such increase shall become effective on January 1 of the following year.

A local school board representing a city or town may establish a salary increase prior to December 31 in any year preceding a year in which members are to be elected or appointed. Such increase shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which the election or appointment occurs if the election or appointment occurs prior to July 1 and shall be become effective January 1 of the following year if the election or appointment occurs after June 30.

No salary increase may become effective during an incumbent member’s term of office; however, this restriction shall not apply if the school board members are elected or appointed for staggered terms.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-67.2; 1950, pp. 465, 490; 1952, c. 170; 1954, cc. 206, 709; 1956, c. 317; 1956, Ex. Sess., cc. 5, 44; 1958, c. 375; 1960, c. 217; 1962, c. 223; 1964, c. 166; 1966, c. 82; 1968, c. 731; 1970, c. 498; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 93; 1972, c. 623; 1973, c. 153; 1974, cc. 158, 197; 1975, c. 468; 1976, cc. 127, 176; 1977, cc. 389, 512; 1978, c. 488; 1979, c. 237; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 482; 1982, c. 488; 1983, c. 562; 1984, c. 483; 1985, c. 493; 1986, cc. 446, 486; 1987, c. 348; 1988, cc. 567, 582; 1989, cc. 464, 504; 1990, cc. 805, 878; 1991, c. 279; 1992, c. 406; 1993, cc. 658, 783; 1994, cc. 847, 900; 1995, c. 487; 1996, cc. 898, 1041; 1997, cc. 233, 366; 1998, cc. 309, 395, 600, 872; 1999, cc. 423, 656, 689; 2000, cc. 721, 738; 2001, cc. 603, 607; 2002, cc. 669, 733, 739; 2003, cc. 175, 713; 2004, cc. 179, 199; 2005, cc. 489, 536; 2006, cc. 126, 840; 2007, c. 53; 2010, c. 723; 2013, c. 278; 2017, c. 323; 2018, cc. 65, 80; 2020, c. 1046; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 20, 79, 80, 81; 2022, c. 662.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 840, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision F 1 of § 22.1-32, a local school board representing a county having the traditional form of government may establish a salary increase prior to July 1, 2006, if (i) such county school board has seven members who are appointed for staggered terms; (ii) the seven member school board has not received a salary increase for 10 years; (iii) a salary increase is authorized by this act; and (iv) at least one member of such appointed county school board is appointed in 2006. Such increase shall become effective on January 2, 2007.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 79 and 80, cl. 4 provides: “That this act shall become effective on July 1, 2022, provided that the consolidation of the Alleghany County and City of Covington school divisions is approved by the Board of Education prior to that date.” The Board of Education approved the consolidation on January 28, 2021.

Acts 2022, c. 662, cl. 2 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to reduce the maximum salaries for school board members that are in effect prior to the effective date of this act.”

The 1999 amendments.

The amendment by c. 423, effective March 25, 1999, substituted “$3,600.00” for “$1,500.00” following “Warren” in subsection A, substituted “$5,000.00” for “$3,000.00” following “Hampton” in subsection B, and in subsection F 2, substituted “December 31 in any year preceding a year” for “January 1” in the first sentence, and substituted “year in which the election occurs” for “following year” in the second sentence.

The 1999 amendment by c. 656, effective March 28, 1999, in subsection A, substituted “$5,000.00” for “$1,200.00” following “Amelia,” substituted “$12,000.00” for “$8,000.00” following “Arlington,” substituted “$4,000.00” for “$2,400.00” following “Bedford,” substituted “$4,800.00” for “$2,400.00” following “Charlotte,” substituted “$3,600.00” for “$1,800.00” following “Cumberland,” substituted “$2,400.00” for “$1,200.00” following “Middlesex,” substituted “$3,000.00” for “$1,200.00” following “New Kent,” substituted “$3,600.00” for “$1,800.00” following “Prince George,” substituted “3,600.00” for “1,800.00” following “Pulaski,” substituted “$3,600.00” for “$1,500.00” following “Warren”; substituted “$5,000.00” for “$2,400.00” following “Petersburg” in subsection B; in the first sentence of subdivision F 1, substituted “of” for “in,” substituted “December 31,” for “January 1,” inserted “preceding a year” following “in any year,” deleted “following” preceding “year in which,” in subdivision F 2, and inserted “in which the election or appointment occurs” in the second sentence.

The 1999 amendment by c. 689, added the second sentence of subdivision F 1.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 721 and 738 in subsection A, substituted “$12,000.00” for “$8,000” following “Prince William”; and in subsection B, added “Colonial Heights - $2,400.00” and “Falls Church - $3,000.00.” The amendment by c. 738, in subsection A, substituted “$4,500.00” for “$3,500.00” following “Culpeper”; and in subsection B, added “Lynchburg - $2,400.00,” substituted “$4,800.00” for $2,400.00” following “Manassas,” substituted “$4,200.00” for “$3,000.00” following “Roanoke,” and substituted “$5,000.00” for “$3,500.00” for “Suffolk.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 603, increased the salary limit for Greene from $3,600 to $5,800, for Lancaster from $3,000 to $6,000, for Louisa from $3,600 to $4,800, for Russell from $1,800 to $3,600, for Portsmouth from $2,700 to $5,000, and for Salem from $1,700 to $3,600.

The 2001 amendment by c. 607 increased the salary limit for Lancaster from $3,000 to $6,000, for Louisa from $3,600 to $4,800, for Russell from $1,800 to $3,600, for Portsmouth from $2,700 to $5,000, and for Salem from $1,700 to $3,600.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 669, in subsection B of this section as it read prior to amendment by Acts 2002, c. 733, increased the salary limits for Chesapeake from $5,000 to $10,000, for Fredericksburg from $3,600 to $7,500, and for Newport News from $5,000 to $12,000.

The 2002 amendment by c. 733 inserted present subsection A and redesignated former subsections A through D as present subsections B through E; in present subsection B, inserted “appointed” in the introductory language, and deleted entries for the counties of Albemarle, Amelia, Appomattox, Arlington, Augusta, Bath, Bedford, Bland, Botetourt, Buchanan, Buckingham, Campbell, Caroline, Carroll, Charles City, Charlotte, Chesterfield, Clarke, Craig, Culpeper, Dickenson, Dinwiddie, Fairfax, Fauquier, Floyd, Fluvanna, Franklin, Frederick, Giles, Gloucester, Goochland, Grayson, Greene, Halifax, Henrico, Henry, Highland, James City, King and Queen, King George, King William, Lancaster, Lee, Loudoun, Louisa, Lunenburg, Madison, Mathews, Mecklenburg, Middlesex, Montgomery, Nelson, New Kent, Northumberland, Nottoway, Orange, Page, Patrick, Pittsylvania, Powhatan, Prince George, Prince William, Pulaski, Rappahannock, Roanoke, Rockbridge, Rockingham, Russell, Scott, Shenandoah,
Smyth, Southampton, Spotsylvania, Stafford, Surry, Sussex,
Tazewell, Warren, Washington, Westmoreland, Wise, Wythe, and York; in present subsection C, inserted “appointed” in the introductory language, and deleted entries for the cities or towns of Alexandria, Bristol, Chesapeake, Colonial Beach, Colonial Heights, Fairfax, Falls Church, Fredericksburg, Hampton, Manassas, Newport News, Norton, Petersburg, Portsmouth, Radford, Richmond, Suffolk, Virginia Beach, Waynesboro, and Williamsburg; substituted “$2,000” for “$1,100” in present subsection D; deleted former subsection E, which read: “Contingent upon finalization of the planned consolidation of the school divisions of Alleghany County and the City of Clifton Forge, the members of the newly consolidated school board representing the City of Clifton Forge shall be paid an amount equal to that paid the members of the present school board of Alleghany County”; in subsection F, inserted “appointed” and “subsections B and C of” in the first sentence, substituted “elected school board” for “school board whose membership is elected in whole or in part” and deleted “within the limit set herein” following “salary increase” in the second sentence.

The 2002 amendment by c. 739, in this section as it read prior to amendment by Acts 2002, c. 733, in subsection A, increased the salary limits for Appomattox from $3,000 to $5,000, for Fluvanna from $2,400 to $3,400, and for York from $4,000 to $6,000, and in subsection B increased the salary limit for Newport News from $5,000 to $12,000.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the section is set out above as amended by Acts 2002, c. 733.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 175 inserted “Southampton—$5,300.00” in subsection B.

The 2003 amendment by c. 713 added “or, in the case of elected school boards for a division comprised of a county having the county manager plan of government, as provided in §

15.2-702.1

” at the end of subsection A, and substituted “at least 40 percent of such members” for “at least one-half of such members” near the end of the first sentence of subdivision F 1.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 179 and 199 are identical, and increased the salary limit for Manassas Park from $1,800 to $3,000 in subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 489 increased the annual salary of school board members in the city of Richmond from $3,400.00 to $5,000.00 in subsection B; and in the city of Salem from $3,600.00 to $4,800.00 in subsection C.

The 2005 amendment by c. 536 increased the annual salary of school board members in the city of Salem from $3,600.00 to $4,800.00 in subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 126, in subsection A, divided the former first sentence into the present first and second sentences by deleting “or, in the case of” following “provided by charter” at the end of the present first sentence, in the second sentence, added “However, any,” substituted “board of a school” for “boards for,” and added the language beginning “may, after a public hearing” at the end.

The 2006 amendment by c. 840 substituted “$8,000.00” for “$4,600.00” after Hanover in subsection B, and substituted “$3,600.00” for “$2,400.00” after Hopewell in subsection C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 53 increased the salary limit for Northampton from $1,800 to $3,000 in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 723 decreased the salary limit for Amherst from $2,400 to $2,200 in subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 278 deleted “of this section” following “subsections B and C” in the first sentence of subsection F; and inserted “if the election or appointment occurs prior to July 1 and shall be become effective January 1 of the following year if the election or appointment occurs after June 30” at the end of subdivision F 2.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 323, in subsection A, deleted the last sentence which formerly read: “However, any elected school board of a school division comprised of a county having the county manager plan of government, as provided in §

15.2-702.1

may, after a public hearing pursuant to notice in the manner provided in subdivision 8 of § 22.1-79, set the annual salary of its members at no more than $25,000, except that the annual salary of the chairman, vice-chairman, or both, may exceed $25,000.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 65 and 80 are identical, and deleted “Norfolk — $3,000.00” in subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1046, in subsection C, added “Winchester — $4,500.00” in the list at the end.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 20 and 81, effective July 1, 2021, are identical and in subsection B, deleted “Brunswick — $1,800.00.”

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 79 and 80, cl. 2, are identical and added subsection G. For contingent effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 662, deleted subsection A designation; in the introductory paragraph, inserted “or appointed” and added “provided that”; deleted subsections B and C, which referred to salary caps of counties and cities of appointed school board; redesignated subsections D and E as subdivisions 1 and 2; deleted “in its discretion” following “may” in subdivisions 1 and 2; rewrote subsection F, which read: “No appointed school board shall request the General Assembly’s consideration of an increase in its annual salary limit as established in subsections B and C unless such school board has taken an affirmative vote on the requested increase. Further, no elected school board shall be awarded a salary increase, unless, upon an affirmative vote by such school board, a specific salary increase shall be approved. Local school boards shall adopt such increases according to the following procedures:”; added the subdivision 3 designation; in subdivision 3, added “No” and substituted “is approved” for “shall be approved”; redesignated subdivisions F 1 and F 2 as subdivisions 3 a and 3 b; in subdivision 3 a, deleted “40 percent of such members are to be elected or appointed. However, a school board serving a county having the county manager plan of government and whose membership totals five may establish a salary increase prior to July 1 in any year in which” following “least” and substituted “two members are to be elected” for “two of the five members are to be elected”; redesignated the second paragraph of subdivision F 2 as subdivision 4; deleted subsection G, which read: “(Effective July 1, 2022) The members of the consolidated school board representing Alleghany County and the City of Covington shall be paid an annual salary not to exceed $1,500.”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Salary increases. —

This section authorizes a school board, based on population count, to increase the annual salary of its members to the maximum paid to city council members, and the annual salary of its chairman to the maximum paid to the city mayor; upon passage of a motion in the year 2003 approving salary increases, July 1, 2004, is the earliest date that such increases may be effective. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Harry B. Blevins, Member, Senate of Virginia, 02-099, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 83 (11/15/02).

§ 22.1-33.
Special districts continued.

Special town school districts which now exist for the purposes of representation on division school boards shall continue.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-43; 1954, c. 638; 1964, c. 490; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 225; 1980, c. 559.